Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 15. Parties.

Cross references. —

For rules of court on parties, see Civ. R. 17-25.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parties, § 1 et seq.

67A C.J.S., Parties, §§ 1-7.

Capacity of cotenant to maintain suit to set aside conveyance of interest of another cotenant because of fraud, undue influence, or incompetency, 7 ALR2d 1317.

Contract made in consideration of naming child as enforceable by child, 21 ALR2d 1067.

Maintainability of bastardy proceedings by infant prosecutrix in her own name and right, 50 ALR2d 1029.

Capacity of local or foreign personal representative to maintain action for death under foreign statute providing for action by personal representative, 52 ALR2d 1016.

Capacity of foreign domicillary, or of ancillary, personal representative to maintain action for death, under statute of forum providing for action by personal representative, 52 ALR2d 1048.

Capacity of one who is mentally incompetent but not so adjudicated to sue in his own name, 71 ALR2d 1247.

Capacity of guardian to sue or to be sued outside state where appointed, 94 ALR2d 162.

Right of illegitimate child to maintain action to determine paternity, 19 ALR4th 1082.

Sec. 09.15.010.
Parents or guardian may sue for injuries or death to child.

A parent may maintain an action as plaintiff for the injury or death of a child below the age of majority.
A guardian may maintain an action as plaintiff for the injury or death of a ward.

History.

(§ 30.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 62 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 09.15.020.
Parents or guardian may sue for seduction of child.

A parent may maintain an action as plaintiff for the seduction of a child below the age of majority. The guardian may maintain an action as plaintiff for the seduction of a ward. The action may be maintained even though the child or ward is not living with or in the service of the plaintiff at the time of the seduction or afterwards and there is no loss of service.

History.

(§ 30.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 63 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 09.15.030.
Unmarried females may sue for seduction. [Repealed, § 64 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 09.15.040.
Death or disability of a party.

In case of the death or disability of a party to an action, the court may at any time within two years after the death or disability, on motion, allow the action to be continued by or against that party’s personal representatives or successor in interest.

History.

(§ 5.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Fomerly AS

09.65.050

. Renumbered in 1994.

Cross references. —

For related court rule, see Civ. R. 25.